dicts/armenian_western_2.aff
FLAG long
# ալ - ել  verb class specific
SFX	VB	Y 	246 
SFX	VB	ել	ող/CHDEPPABGEIN .
SFX	VB	իլ	ող/CHDEPPABGEIN .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացող/CHDEPPABGEIN .
SFX	VB	ել	ողներ/CHDEABG2IN .
SFX	VB	իլ	ողներ/CHDEABG2IN .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացողներ/CHDEABG2IN .
SFX	VB	ել	ած/CHDEABGEIN .
SFX	VB	ել	ածներ/CHDEABG2IN .
SFX	VB	իլ	ած/CHDEABGEIN .
SFX	VB	իլ	ածներ/CHDEABG2IN .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացած/CHDEABGEIN .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացածներ/CHDEABG2IN .
SFX	VB	ել	ուող/CHDEABGEIN .
SFX	VB	իլ	ուող/CHDEABGEIN .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուող/CHDEABGEIN .
SFX	VB	ել	ուողներ/CHDEABG2IN .
SFX	VB	իլ	ուողներ/CHDEABG2IN .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուողներ/CHDEABG2IN .
SFX	VB	ել	ուած/CHDEABGEIN .
SFX	VB	ել	ուածներ/CHDEABG2IN .
SFX	VB	իլ	ուած/CHDEABGEIN .
SFX	VB	իլ	ուածներ/CHDEABG2IN .
SFX	VB	ել	եցուած/CHDEABGEIN .
SFX	VB	ել	եցուածներ/CHDEABG2IN .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուած/CHDEABGEIN .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուածներ/CHDEABG2IN .
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուած/CHDEABGEIN .
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուածներ/CHDEABG2IN .
SFX	VB	ել	եցնող/CHDEABGEIN .
SFX	VB	ել	եցնողներ/CHDEABG2IN .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացնող/CHDEABGEIN .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացնողներ/CHDEABG2IN .
SFX	VB	իլ	եցնող/CHDEABGEIN .
SFX	VB	իլ	եցնողներ/CHDEABG2IN .
SFX	VB	ել	եցուցած/CHDEABGEIN .
SFX	VB	ել	եցուցածներ/CHDEABG2IN .	
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուցած/CHDEABGEIN .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուցածներ/CHDEABG2IN .	
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուցած/CHDEABGEIN .
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուցածներ/CHDEABG2IN .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացեր .
SFX	VB	իլ	եր .
SFX	VB	ել	եցուիլ/CHDE .
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուիլ/CHDE .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուիլ/CHDE .	
SFX	VB	ել	եցուելու/CHDE .
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուելու/CHDE .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուելու/CHDE .
SFX	VB	ել	եցուելէ/CHDE .
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուելէ/CHDE .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուելէ/CHDE .
SFX	VB	ել	եցուելով/CH .
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուելով/CH .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուելով/CH .
SFX	VB	ել	եցուցեր .	
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուցեր .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուցեր .
SFX	VB	ել	է .
SFX	VB	իլ	է .	
SFX	VB	ալ	ա .
SFX	VB	ել	եցէք .	
SFX	VB	իլ	եցէք .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացէք .
SFX	VB	ել	ուէ .	
SFX	VB	իլ	ուէ.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուէ.
SFX	VB	ել	ուեցէք .	
SFX	VB	իլ	ուեցէք .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուեցէք .
SFX	VB	ել	եցուր .	
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուր .	
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուր .
SFX	VB	ել	եցուցէք .	
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուցէք .	
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուցէք .
SFX	VB	ել	եցնել/CHG2ABINDE	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցնել/CHG2ABINDE	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացնել/CHG2ABINDE	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցներ	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցներ	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացներ	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցնեմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցնեմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացնեմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցնես/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցնես/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացնես/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցնէ/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցնէ/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացնէ/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցնենք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցնենք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացնենք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցնէք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցնէք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացնէք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցնեն/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցնեն/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացնեն/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցնէի/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցնէի/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացնէի/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցնէիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցնէիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացնէիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցնէր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցնէր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացնէր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցնէինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցնէինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացնէինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցնէիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցնէիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացնէիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցնէին/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցնէին/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացնէին/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցուցի/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուցի/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուցի/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցուցիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուցիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուցիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցուց/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուց/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուց/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցուցինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուցինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուցինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցուցիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուցիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուցիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցուցին/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուցին/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուցին/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցնելի	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցնելի	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացնելի	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուելի	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցուելի	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուելի	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուելի	.
SFX	VB	ել	ելիք/DEGEABINPP	.
SFX	VB	իլ	ելիք/DEGEABINPP	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ալիք/DEGEABINPP	.
SFX	VB	ել	ելի/DEGEABINPP	.
SFX	VB	իլ	ելի/DEGEABINPP	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ալի/DEGEABINPP	.
SFX	VB	ել	եր	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եր	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ար	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուիլ/CHDE	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուել/CHG2ABINDE	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուիմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուիս/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուի/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուին/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցուեր .
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուեր .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուեր .
SFX	VB	ել	եցուիլ/CHDE	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցուել/CHG2ABINDE	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուիլ/CHDE	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուել/CHG2ABINDE	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուիլ/CHDE	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուել/CHG2ABINDE	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցուեմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուեմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուեմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցուես/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուես/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուես/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցուի/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուի/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուի/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցուենք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուենք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուենք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցուէք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուէք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուէք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցուեն/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուեն/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուեն/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուէի/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուէիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուէր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուէինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուէիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուէին/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցուէի/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուէի/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուէի/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցուէիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուէիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուէիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցուէր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուէր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուէր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցուէինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուէինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուէինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցուէիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուէիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուէիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցուէին/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցուէին/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուէին/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցի/CH	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցայ/CH	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացի/CH	.
SFX	VB	ել	եցիր/CH	.
SFX	VB	իլ	եցար/CH	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացիր/CH	.
SFX	VB	ել	եց/CH .
SFX	VB	իլ	եցաւ/CH .
SFX	VB	ալ	աց/CH .
SFX	VB	ել	եցինք/CH .
SFX	VB	իլ	եցանք/CH .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացինք/CH .
SFX	VB	ել	եցիք/CH .
SFX	VB	իլ	եցաք/CH .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացիք/CH .
SFX	VB	ել	եցին/CH .
SFX	VB	իլ	եցան/CH .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացին/CH .
SFX	VB	ել	ուեցայ/CH	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուեցար/CH	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուեցաւ/CH .
SFX	VB	ել	ուեցանք/CH .
SFX	VB	ել	ուեցաք/CH .
SFX	VB	ել	ուեցան/CH .
SFX	VB	իլ	ուեցայ/CH	.
SFX	VB	իլ	ուեցար/CH	.
SFX	VB	իլ	ուեցաւ/CH .
SFX	VB	իլ	ուեցանք/CH .
SFX	VB	իլ	ուեցաք/CH .
SFX	VB	իլ	ուեցան/CH .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուեցայ/CH	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուեցար/CH	.
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուեցաւ/CH .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուեցանք/CH .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուեցաք/CH .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուեցան/CH .


#nal ուշացայ մօտեցայ
SFX	VC	Y	79
SFX	VC	նալ	ցայ/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցար/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցաւ/CH .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցանք/CH .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցաք/CH .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցան/CH .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուիլ/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուիմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուիս/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուի/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուին/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցող/CHDEABGEIN .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցողներ/CHDEABG2IN .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցած/CHDEABGEIN .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցածներ/CHDEABG2IN .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուող/CHDEABGEIN .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուողներ/CHDEABG2IN .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուած/CHDEABGEIN .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուածներ/CHDEABG2IN .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնող/CHDEABGEIN .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնողներ/CHDEABG2IN .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուցած/CHDEABGEIN .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուցածներ/CHDEABG2IN .	
SFX	VC	նալ	ցեր .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուիլ/CHDE .	
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուել/CHG2ABINDE .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուցեր  .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցիր .	
SFX	VC	նալ	նար .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցէք .	
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուէ.	
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուեցէք .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուր .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուցէք .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնել/CHG2ABINDE	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցներ	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնեմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնես/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնէ/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնենք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնէք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնեն/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնէի/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնէիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնէր/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնէինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնէիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնէին/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուցի/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուցիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուց/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուցինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուցիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուցին/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնելիք/CHGEABINPPDE	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուելիք/CHGEABINPPDE	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնելի/CHGEABINPPDE	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուելի/CHGEABINPPDE	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուեր    .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուիմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուիս/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուի/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուին/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուէի/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուէիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուէր/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուէինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուէիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուէին/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուեցայ/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուեցար/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուեցաւ/CH .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուեցանք/CH .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուեցաք/CH .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուեցան/CH .
